New Jersey, session 222, A4079.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1992, c.209 (C.2C:12-10) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  As used in this act: (1)   "Course of conduct" means repeatedly maintaining a visual or physical proximity to a person; directly, indirectly, or through third parties, by any action, method, device, or means, following, monitoring, observing, surveilling, threatening, or communicating to or about, a person, or interfering with a person's property; repeatedly committing harassment against a person; or repeatedly conveying, or causing to be conveyed, verbal or written threats or threats conveyed by any other means of communication or threats implied by conduct or a combination thereof directed at or toward a person.  Course of conduct shall include any of the aforementioned acts and any repeated communications or attempts to communicate, by any means, with an adoptive child under the age of 18, made by a person whose parental rights for that child have been terminated, and being done contrary to the instructions of that childs adoptive parent. (2)   "Repeatedly" means on two or more occasions. (3)   "Emotional distress" means significant mental suffering or distress. (4)   "Cause a reasonable person to fear" means to cause fear which a reasonable victim, similarly situated, would have under the circumstances. b.    A person is guilty of stalking, a crime of the fourth degree, if he purposefully or knowingly engages in a course of conduct directed at a specific person that would cause a reasonable person to fear for his safety or the safety of a third person or suffer other emotional distress. c.     A person is guilty of a crime of the third degree if he commits the crime of stalking in violation of an existing court order prohibiting the behavior. d.    A person who commits a second or subsequent offense of stalking against the same victim is guilty of a crime of the third degree. e.     A person is guilty of a crime of the third degree if he commits the crime of stalking while serving a term of imprisonment or while on parole or probation as the result of a conviction for any indictable offense under the laws of this State, any other state or the United States. f.     This act shall not apply to conduct which occurs during organized group picketing. (cf: P.L.2009, c.28, s.1) 2.    (New section)  a.  If a person whose parental rights for a child have been terminated commits one or more of the following acts upon a parent who has adopted that child, a court may order, as a condition of pre-trial release or in a judgment of conviction, that the person refrain from any contact with the adoptive parent: (1)  Homicide N.J.S.2C:11-1 et seq. (2)  Assault N.J.S.2C:12-1 (3)  Terroristic threats  N.J.S.2C:12-3 (4)  Kidnapping N.J.S.2C:13-1 (5)  Criminal restraint N.J.S.2C:13-2 (6)  False imprisonment N.J.S.2C:13-3 (7)  Sexual assault   N.J.S.2C:14-2 (8)  Criminal sexual contact  N.J.S.2C:14-3 (9)  Lewdness N.J.S.2C:14-4 (10) Criminal mischief N.J.S.2C:17-3 (11) Burglary    N.J.S.2C:18-2 (12) Criminal trespass N.J.S.2C:18-3 (13) Harassment    N.J.S.2C:33-4 (14) Stalking    P.L.1992, c.209 (C.2C:12-10) b.   Restraints that a court may impose pursuant to subsection a. of this section may include: (1)  restraining the defendant from entering the residence, property, school, or place of employment of the adoptive parent and requiring the defendant to stay away from any place specifically named and frequented regularly by the adoptive parent; (2)  restraining the defendant from making contact with the adoptive parent, including forbidding the defendant from personally or through an agent initiating any communication likely to cause annoyance or alarm including, but not limited to, personal, written, or telephone contact, or contact via electronic device, with the adoptive parent, the adoptive parent's employers, employees, or fellow workers, or others with whom communication would be likely to cause annoyance or alarm to the adoptive parent.  As used in this paragraph, "communication" shall have the same meaning as defined in subsection q. of N.J.S.2C:1-14; and (3)  any other relief necessary to protect the adoptive parent at the discretion of the court, including but not limited to requiring the defendant to pay to the victim monetary compensation for losses suffered as a direct result of the act or requiring the defendant to undergo a psychiatric evaluation. c.   (1) Restraints imposed by a court pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for the period of time fixed by the court, which shall not be longer than the maximum term of imprisonment, incarceration, or probation allowed by law for the offense for which the person subject to the order was convicted. (2)  When the court imposes restraints pursuant to this section and the defendant is sentenced to any form of probationary supervision or participation in the Intensive Supervision Program, the court shall make compliance with the restraints an express condition of probation or the Intensive Supervision Program, and this condition shall not dissolve sooner than the conclusion of the probationary supervision or participation in the Intensive Supervision Program. (3)  When the court imposes restraints pursuant to this section and the person is also sentenced to a term of incarceration, compliance with the terms and conditions of the restraints shall be made an express condition of the person's release from confinement or incarceration on parole, and this condition shall not dissolve sooner than the conclusion of that period of parole. d.   Notice of any restraints imposed pursuant to this section shall be sent by the clerk of the court or other person designated by the court to appropriate law enforcement agencies.  The restraints ordered by the court shall be in effect throughout the State, and shall be enforced by all law enforcement officers. e.   A violation by the convicted defendant of any restraints imposed shall constitute an offense under subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:29-9 and each order which includes restraints imposed pursuant to this section shall so state. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment.